New Jersey, session 222, S1567.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The title of P.L.2021, c.142 is amended to read as follows: An Act establishing immunity relating to COVID-19 spread in planed real estate developments and supplementing Title 2A of the New Jersey Statutes. 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.142 is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  A planned real estate development shall be immune from civil liability for damages arising from, or related to, an exposure to, or transmission of, COVID-19 on the premises of the planned real estate development, so long as the planned real estate development has prominently displayed at the entrance of any communal space shared by the planned real estate developments residents and their guests, such as pools, gyms, and clubhouses, a sign stating the following warning: ANY PERSON ENTERING THE PREMISES WAIVES ALL CIVIL LIABILITY AGAINST THE PLANNED REAL ESTATE DEVELOPMENT FOR DAMAGES ARISING FROM, OR RELATED TO, AN EXPOSURE TO, OR TRANSMISSION OF, COVID-19 ON THE PREMISES, EXCEPT FOR ACTS OR OMISSIONS CONSTITUTING A CRIME, ACTUAL FRAUD, ACTUAL MALICE, GROSS NEGLIGENCE, RECKLESSNESS, OR WILLFUL MISCONDUCT. b.  The immunity provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting a crime, actual fraud, actual malice, gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct. c.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or modify any claim for relief under the workers compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq. d.  As used in this section: COVID-19 means the coronavirus disease 2019, as announced by the World Health Organization on February 11, 2020, that is caused by the SARS-CoV-2 virus, [and] first identified in Wuhan, Hubei Province, Peoples Republic of China. Planned real estate development means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-23). (cf: P.L.2021, c.142, s.1) 3.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.142 is amended to read as follows: 2.    This act shall take effect immediately [and shall expire on the first day of calendar year 2022]. (cf: P.L.2021, c.142, s.2) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.